District of Columbia statutes.
26-208

Advancements — Security.

For every advance made as aforesaid a bond in a penalty equal to the ultimate value of the shares advanced may be required, secured by a first mortgage or deed of trust on real estate, and a pledge of the shares advanced upon, as additional or collateral security, which bond shall be conditioned for the payment at the stated meetings of the corporation of the monthly dues on the share so advanced upon and the interest on the sum advanced, and the installments of premium, if made so payable, and all fines chargeable upon arrears of payments, until said shares shall reach their ultimate value aforesaid, or said advance be otherwise canceled or discharged.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1299, ch. 854, § 693
1981 Ed., § 26-508.
1973 Ed., § 26-407.